Utah statutes.
78B-6-138.   Pre-existing parent's rights and duties dissolved.
(1)  A pre-existing parent of an adopted child is released from all parental
duties toward and all responsibilities for the adopted child, including
residual rights, and has no further rights with regard to that child at the
earlier of:
(a)  the time the pre-existing parent's parental rights are terminated; or
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (2), and subject to Subsection (3), the
time the final decree of adoption is entered.
(2)  The rights and duties of a pre-existing parent described in Subsection
(1) who, at the time the child is adopted, is lawfully married to the person
adopting the child are not released or terminated under Subsection (1)(b).
(3)  The rights and duties of a pre-existing parent described in Subsection
(1) who, at the time the child is adopted, is not lawfully married to the
person adopting the child are terminated as provided in Subsection (1)(b).
